Utah statutes.
78B-6-1238.   Clerk of court to be custodian.

If the security of the proceeds of the sale is taken, or when an investment of any proceeds is made, it shall be done, except as otherwise provided, in the name of the clerk of the district court.  The clerk of the court shall hold the security for the use and benefit of the parties interested, subject to an order of the court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

